Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-143
Division; joint activities; authorized.

The division may engage in all activities jointly with the United States, with other states, with municipalities or other agencies of this state, and with persons owning privately owned public use airports.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 11(3), p. 97;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 36.